Utah statutes.
58-80-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Certified medical language interpreter" means a medical language
interpreter who has received a certificate from the division under this
chapter.
(2)  "Health care provider" means a person licensed under:
(a)  Title 58, Chapter 5a, Podiatric Physician Licensing Act;
(b)  Title 58, Chapter 16a, Utah Optometry Practice Act;
(c)  Title 58, Chapter 17b, Pharmacy Practice Act;
(d)  Title 58, Chapter 24b, Physical Therapist Practice Act;
(e)  Title 58, Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act;
(f)  Title 58, Chapter 31c, Nurse Licensure Compact;
(g)  Title 58, Chapter 31d, Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact;
(h)  Title 58, Chapter 44a, Nurse Midwife Practice Act;
(i)  Title 58, Chapter 57, Respiratory Care Practices Act;
(j)  Title 58, Chapter 60, Mental Health Professional Practice Act;
(k)  Title 58, Chapter 61, Psychologist Licensing Act;
(l)  Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act;
(m)  Title 58, Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act;
(n)  Title 58, Chapter 69, Dentist and Dental Hygienist Practice Act;
(o)  Title 58, Chapter 70a, Physician Assistant Act;
(p)  Title 58, Chapter 71, Naturopathic Physician Practice Act;
(q)  Title 58, Chapter 73, Chiropractic Physician Practice Act; or
(r)  Title 58, Chapter 77, Direct-entry Midwife Act.
(3)  "Medical language interpreter" means a person who, for compensation,
performs verbal language interpretation services between a health care
provider who speaks English and another person for the purpose of assisting
the person in seeking or obtaining medical advice, diagnoses, or treatment.
(4)  "National standards of practice" means the National Standards of
Practice, published by the National Council on Interpreting in Health Care.
